ru: Схема болтового соединения коленчатого вала: На 10 болтов; На 3 болта; На 4 болта; На 5 болтов; На 6 болтов; На 8 болтов; Другое
sk-SK: Rozloženie skrutiek kľukového hriadeľa: 10-skrutkové; 3-skrutkové; 4-skrutkové; 5-skrutkové; 6-skrutkové; 8-skrutkové; Iné
sv: Vevaxelns bultmönster: 10-bult; 3-bult; 4-bult; 5-bult; 6-bult; 8-bult; Övrigt
de: Schraubenmuster der Kurbelwelle: 10-Loch; 3-Loch; 4-Loch; 5-Loch; 6-Loch; 8-Loch; Andere
bg-BG: Модел на болтовете на коляновия вал: 10 болта; 3 болта; 4 болта; 5 болта; 6 болта; 8 болта; Други
es: Patrón de pernos del cigüeñal: 10 pernos; 3 pernos; 4 pernos; 5 pernos; 6 pernos; 8 pernos; Otro
el: Μοτίβο μπουλονιού στροφαλοφόρου άξονα: 10 μπουλονιών; 3 μπουλονιών; 4 μπουλονιών; 5 μπουλονιών; 6 μπουλονιών; 8 μπουλονιών; Άλλο
zh-CN: 曲轴螺栓孔位图: 10 螺栓; 3 螺栓; 4 螺栓; 5 螺栓; 6 螺栓; 8 螺栓; 其他
tr: Krank mili cıvata düzeni: 10 cıvatalı; 3 cıvatalı; 4 cıvatalı; 5 cıvatalı; 6 cıvatalı; 8 cıvatalı; Diğer
hu: Főtengely csavarkialakítása: 10 csavaros; 3 csavaros; 4 csavaros; 5 csavaros; 6 csavaros; 8 csavaros; Egyéb
ja: クランクシャフトボルトパターン: 10ボルト; 3ボルト; 4ボルト; 5ボルト; 6ボルト; 8ボルト; その他
nb: Veivakselboltmønster: 10-bolt; 3-bolt; 4-bolt; 5-bolt; 6-bolt; 8-bolt; Annet
da: Krumtapakslens boltmønster: 10-bolts; 3-bolts; 4-bolts; 5-bolts; 6-bolts; 8-bolts; Andet
en: Crankshaft bolt pattern: 10-bolt; 3-bolt; 4-bolt; 5-bolt; 6-bolt; 8-bolt; Other
fi: Kampiakselin pulttijako: 10-pulttinen; 3-pulttinen; 4-pulttinen; 5-pulttinen; 6-pulttinen; 8-pulttinen; Muu
th: รูปแบบรูยึดเพลาข้อเหวี่ยง: 10 โบลต์; 3 โบลต์; 4 โบลต์; 5 โบลต์; 6 โบลต์; 8 โบลต์; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 曲軸螺栓孔位: 10 螺栓; 3 螺栓; 4 螺栓; 5 螺栓; 6 螺栓; 8 螺栓; 其他
sl-SI: Vzorec vijakov ročične gredi: 10 vijakov; 3 vijaki; 4 vijaki; 5 vijakov; 6 vijakov; 8 vijakov; Drugo
cs: Rozteč šroubů klikového hřídele: Na 10 šroubů; Na 3 šrouby; Na 4 šrouby; Na 5 šroubů; Na 6 šroubů; Na 8 šroubů; Ostatní
vi: Kiểu bố trí bu lông trục khuỷu: 10 bu-lông; 3 bu-lông; 4 bu-lông; 5 bu-lông; 6 bu-lông; 8 bu-lông; Khác
hr-HR: Uzorak vijka radilice: S 10 vijaka; S 3 vijka; S 4 vijka; S 5 vijaka; Sa 6 vijaka; S 8 vijaka; Ostalo
nl: Krukas boutpatroon: 10-bouts; 3-bouts; 4-bouts; 5-bouts; 6-bouts; 8-bouts; Overige
pt-PT: Padrão de parafusos da cambota: 10 parafusos; 3 parafusos; 4 parafusos; 5 parafusos; 6 parafusos; 8 parafusos; Outro
pt-BR: Padrão de parafusos do virabrequim: 10 parafusos; 3 parafusos; 4 parafusos; 5 parafusos; 6 parafusos; 8 parafusos; Outros
ko: 크랭크축 볼트 패턴: 10볼트; 3볼트; 4볼트; 5볼트; 6볼트; 8볼트; 기타
pl: Układ śrub wału korbowego: Na 10 śrub; Na 3 śruby; Na 4 śruby; Na 5 śrub; Na 6 śrub; Na 8 śrub; Inny
it: Schema di foratura dell'albero motore: 10 bulloni; 3 bulloni; 4 bulloni; 5 bulloni; 6 bulloni; 8 bulloni; Altro
lt-LT: Alkūninio veleno varžtų išdėstymas: 10 varžtų; 3 varžtų; 4 varžtų; 5 varžtų; 6 varžtų; 8 varžtų; Kita
fr: Configuration des boulons du vilebrequin: 10 boulons; 3 boulons; 4 boulons; 5 boulons; 6 boulons; 8 boulons; Autre
ro-RO: Model șuruburi arbore cotit: Cu 10 șuruburi; Cu 3 șuruburi; Cu 4 șuruburi; Cu 5 șuruburi; Cu 6 șuruburi; Cu 8 șuruburi; Altele